Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2940
Action without a meeting.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, any action that may be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting if each member entitled to vote on such action consents to the action in a record.

(2) Consent may be withdrawn by a member in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a consent from each member entitled to vote.

(3) The consent record of any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 40.